Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB531.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 194A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "department" means the Department for Community
Based Services.
(2) The department shall administer funds received under the Refugee Act of 1980, 8
U.S.C. sec. 1521 et seq.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Implement a statewide strategy to ensure compliance with the Refugee Act
of 1980;
(b) Work with localities to coordinate and support local efforts that align and
comply with the Refugee Act of 1980;
(c) Serve as the primary liaison between immigrant-serving and refugee-
serving organizations and businesses and the federal government;
(d) Advise the Governor, appropriate state agencies, cabinet members, and the
General Assembly on ways to improve state policies with respect to
administering funds pursuant to the Refugee Act of 1980;
(e) Make recommendations to the Governor on whether to accept and where to
settle refugees based on available housing; and
(f) Submit an annual report to the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security, and
to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committees on Appropriations and Revenue, State Government, Health
Services, and Families and Children, that includes:
1. The total number of refugees settled in the Commonwealth and the
number of refugees placed in each county. The department shall also
include any recommendations made to the Governor with respect to
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/29/2026 6:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 838
refugee acceptance and placement;
2. The amount of federal and state dollars allocated for refugee
resettlement services and support;
3. An estimate of the number of refugees enrolled at a Kentucky public
school in preschool through grade twelve (12) and an estimated cost of
educating the identified students using the average base funding level
per pupil computation in KRS 157.360. The Kentucky Department of
Education shall provide the department the data necessary to provide
the information required by this subparagraph; and
4. A breakdown, by type and dollar amount, of the services provided by
the federal government, state government, and nonprofit entities
relating health, economic assistance, or otherwise that are being
provided to refugees in a given fiscal year, including but not limited
to:
a. Employment training and placement;
b. English language training;
c. Cash assistance; and
d. Health and medical assistance.
(4) The department may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to effectuate the provisions of this section.
Section 2. The Kentucky Department of Education shall collect the data
required by subsection (3)(f)3. of Section 1 of this Act for the Department for
Community Based Services' report.
Section 3. The Department for Community Based Services shall issue its first
report by July 1, 2027.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/29/2026 6:39 PM Jacketed